Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5993SV (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 2384 Section 1. Section 321.515, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. A Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a 3 driverless-capable vehicle may operate on the public highways 4 of this state without a conventional human driver physically 5 present in the vehicle, if the vehicle meets all of the 6 following conditions: 7 a. (1) The vehicle is capable of achieving a minimal risk 8 condition if a malfunction of the automated driving system 9 occurs that renders the system unable to perform the entire 10 dynamic driving task within the systemâs intended operational 11 design domain, if any. 12 b. (2) While in driverless operation, the vehicle is 13 capable of operating in compliance with the applicable traffic 14 and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state 15 that govern the performance of the dynamic driving task, unless 16 an exemption has been granted to the vehicle by the department. 17 c. (3) The vehicle has been certified by the vehicleâs 18 manufacturer to be in compliance with all applicable federal 19 motor vehicle safety standards, except to the extent an 20 exemption has been granted for the vehicle under applicable 21 federal law or by the national highway traffic safety 22 administration. 23 b. A driverless-capable vehicle transporting hazardous 24 material shall not operate without a conventional human driver. 25 Sec. 2. Section 321.515, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 b. An automated driving system, while engaged, shall be 28 designed to operate within the systemâs operational design 29 domain and in compliance with the applicable traffic and 30 motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state that 31 govern the performance of the dynamic driving task, unless an 32 exemption has been granted to the vehicle by the department. 33 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 321.515A Civil and criminal liability. 34 1. The owner of a driverless-capable vehicle is deemed to 35 -1- LSB 5993SV (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 2384 be operating the vehicle while the automated driving system is 1 engaged and shall be liable for all of the following: 2 a. Personal injury, death, or property damage that results 3 in connection with the operation of the vehicle. 4 b. Violations of traffic or motor vehicle safety laws and 5 regulations of this state, including but not limited to as 6 described in section 321.517. 7 2. A person who modifies an automated driving system of a 8 driverless-capable vehicle without the manufacturerâs consent 9 shall be liable for any damage related to the operation of the 10 vehicle. However, if the owner of the vehicle directed the 11 person to modify the system, the owner shall be liable. 12